West Virginia, session 2025, HB2157.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 7. SPECIAL STICKERS. §17A-7-2.  Operation of motor vehicles by dealers or other persons under special stickers; application and fees. (a) A member of the West Virginia State Police may at any detachment office, upon application therefor on a form prescribed by the commissioner, issue to a licensed dealer or any other person other than those specified in §17A-7-1 of this code, a paper sticker to be affixed to the left side of the rear window of a motor vehicle or to the left rear of a vehicle which is not self-propelled. Such sticker shall be of a size to be designated by the commissioner and shall be serially numbered and shall indicate the date of issuance thereof.(b) A fee of $10 per sticker shall be collected. The Division of Motor Vehicles may adjust the fee for each sticker every five years on September 1, based on the U. S. Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics most current Consumer Price Index: Provided, That an increase in such fee may not exceed 10 percent of the total fee amount in a single year. The fees will be dispersed as follows: Half shall be deposited in the State Road Fund and half shall be deposited in the special revenue account within the Division of Highways for the maintenance of the West Virginia welcome centers and rest areas along interstate highways in this state.(c) The one-movement sticker authorized by this section is valid for 96 hours after its issuance for the operation of a vehicle, whether under its own power or while being towed, one time only over the streets or highways, and upon being once affixed to a vehicle or used for the one-time movement shall become invalid for subsequent use on that or any other vehicle.(d) Any sticker issued pursuant to this section may be in the form of a sticker, decal, or other form prescribed by the commissioner.(e) The commissioner shall make one-movement stickers authorized by this section available for purchase online subject to the same requirements and fee set forth in this section: Provided, That the fee may be remitted to the division electronically and the sticker may be provided by the division in an electronic format.(f) A one-movement sticker issued pursuant to this article may not be used as evidence of ownership of a vehicle.The Clerk of the House of Delegates and the Clerk of the Senate hereby certify that the foregoing bill is correctly enrolled.  ............................................................... Clerk of the House of Delegates  		............................................................... Clerk of the Senate				                  Originated in the House of Delegates. In effect 90 days from passage.    				............................................................... Speaker of the House of Delegates  						............................................................... President of the Senate  __________   	The within is ................................................ this the........................................... Day of ..........................................................................................................., 2025.  				.............................................................								Governor Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home